Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5706
Base-year employee, defined.

Base-year employee means any individual who was employed in Nebraska and subject to the Nebraska income tax on compensation received from the taxpayer or its predecessors during the base year and who is employed at the project.

Laws 2005, LB 312, § 28.